Idaho, session 2026, H0501.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-1807, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1807. CIRCULATION OF PETITIONS -- PAID SIGNATURE GATHERERS --
VERIFICATION OF PETITION AND SIGNATURE SHEETS -- CERTIFICATION OF PETITION
SIGNERS -- CERTAIN PETITIONS AND SIGNATURES VOID. (1) Any person who cir-
culates any petition for an initiative or referendum shall be a resident
qualified elector of the state of Idaho and at least eighteen (18) years of
age.
(2)(a) Any person who accepts payment to circulate a petition for an
initiative or referendum shall, prior to accepting a signature:
(i) Verbally notify any potential signatory that such person is
accepting payment to gather signatures and provide the name of the
person or entity providing payment to such person; and
(ii) Cause to be printed on each page of any petition for an ini-
tiative or referendum a prominent and legible declaration that
such person is receiving payment in exchange for circulating the
petition and the name of the person persons or entities providing
payment to such person.
(b) At all times a person is circulating a petition pursuant to para-
graph (a) of this subsection, such person shall wear a badge that is
clearly visible to any potential signatory and that contains the words
"paid petition circulator" on it as well as the name of the persons or
entities providing payment to such person.
(c) The Idaho secretary of state shall promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this subsection, which shall provide details re-
garding the font specifications that shall be required for the printed
declaration required under paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection and the
specifications regarding font, shape, color, and size requirements for
the badge required under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3) Each and every sheet of every such petition containing signatures
shall be verified on the face thereof in substantially the following form,
by the person who circulated said sheet of said petition, by his or her affi-
davit thereon, and as a part thereof:
(a) For persons not accepting payment for circulating a petition:


State of Idaho )
)ss.
County of.... )
I,...., being first duly sworn, say that I am a resident qualified elec-
tor of the State of Idaho and at least eighteen (18) years of age; that I have
not and will not accept remuneration in any way related to the petition; that
every person who signed this sheet of the foregoing petition signed his or
her name thereto in my presence; that I believe that each has stated his or
her name, address and residence correctly; and that each signer is a quali-
fied elector of the State of Idaho and a resident of the county of.....
Signed.................................
Post office address.....................
Subscribed and sworn to before me this.... day of.....
(Notary Seal) Notary Public ..........................
Residing at ............................
(b) For persons accepting payment for circulating a petition:
State of Idaho )
)ss.
County of.... )
I,...., being first duly sworn, say that I am a resident qualified elec-
tor of the state State of Idaho and at least eighteen (18) years of age; that
every person who signed this sheet of the foregoing petition signed his or
her name thereto in my presence, after I verbally notified each individual
signer that I will receive payment in exchange for gathering the signatures
on this sheet; that I believe that each has stated his or her name, address
and residence correctly; and that each signer is a qualified elector of the
State of Idaho and a resident of the county of.....
I am accepting payment for the circulation of the foregoing petition
by.... and the address of such payor is.....
Signed.................................
Post office address.....................
Subscribed and sworn to before me this.... day of.....
(Notary Seal) Notary Public ..........................
Residing at ............................
(4) In addition to said affidavit, the county clerk shall carefully ex-
amine said petitions and strike from the petition any names for which he has
determined that the name, address, or signature do not match and confirm that
each name, address, and signature matches those of a qualified elector of the
proper jurisdiction and that the petitions conform to all other provisions
of this section. The county clerk shall attach to the signature sheets a cer-
tificate to the secretary of state substantially as follows:
State of Idaho )
)ss.
County of.... )
To the Honorable...., Secretary of State for the State of Idaho:
I,...., County Clerk of.... County, hereby certify that.... signatures on


this petition are those of qualified electors in Legislative District Num-
ber.....
Signed.................................
County Clerk or Deputy.
(Seal of office)
(5) The county clerk shall deliver the petition or any part thereof to
the person from whom he received it with his certificate attached thereto
as above provided. The forms herein given are not mandatory and if substan-
tially followed in any petition, it shall be sufficient, disregarding cleri-
cal and merely technical error.
(6) Any petition on which signatures are obtained by a person not a
resident qualified elector of the state of Idaho and at least eighteen (18)
years of age shall be void. The definition of resident qualified elector in
section 34-107 34-104, Idaho Code, shall apply to the circulators of initia-
tive and referendum petitions.
(7) Any signature that is not a physical signature, including an elec-
tronic signature, is void.
(8) Any petition for an initiative or referendum on which signatures
are obtained that is circulated in violation of the disclosure provisions
provided in subsection (2) of this section is void.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.